Hawaii statutes.
§468E-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"ASHA" means the American
Speech-Language-Hearing Association, the national administrative office of
which is located in Rockville, Maryland, 10801 Rockville Pike (20852).

"Audiologist" means an individual who
practices audiology.

"Board" means the state board of
speech pathology and audiology, established under section 468E-6.

"Person" means any individual,
organization, or corporate body, except that only an individual may be licensed
under this chapter.

"Speech pathologist" means an
individual who practices speech pathology.

"The practice of audiology" means the
application of principles, methods, and procedures of measurement, prediction,
evaluation, testing, counseling, consultation, and instruction related to the
development and disorders of hearing and related language and speech for the
purpose of modifying hearing function and related language and speech
disorders.

"The practice of speech pathology"
means the application of principles, methods, and procedures of measurement,
prediction, evaluation, testing, counseling, consultation, and instruction
related to the development and disorders of speech and related language and
hearing for the purpose of modifying speech and related language and hearing
disorders. [L 1974, c 48, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 242, §2]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted and definitions rearranged.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next